Illinois, session 104th, SB3750.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Mental Health and Developmental 5Disabilities Code is amended by changing Sections 1-109, 61-129, 2-107, 2-107.1, 3-611, and 3-807 and by adding Section 71-103.5 as follows: 8    (405 ILCS 5/1-103.5 new)9    Sec. 1-103.5. Confinement. "Confinement", with respect to 10a mental health facility, means that an individual is 11prevented or otherwise not permitted to leave the facility. 12    (405 ILCS 5/1-109)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 1-109)13    Sec. 1-109. "Discharge" means the full and physical 14release of any person admitted or otherwise detained under 15this Act from treatment, habilitation, or care and custody.16(Source: P.A. 80-1414.) 17    (405 ILCS 5/1-129)18    Sec. 1-129. Mental illness. "Mental illness" means a 19mental, or emotional disorder that substantially impairs a 20person's thought, perception of reality, emotional process, 21judgment, behavior, or ability to cope with the ordinary   SB3750- 2 -LRB104 20663 KTG 34161 b1demands of life, but does not include a developmental 2disability, a neurocognitive disorder dementia or Alzheimer's 3disease absent psychosis, a substance use disorder, or an 4abnormality manifested only by repeated criminal or otherwise 5antisocial conduct.6(Source: P.A. 100-759, eff. 1-1-19.) 7    (405 ILCS 5/2-107)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 2-107)8    Sec. 2-107. Refusal of services; informing of risks. 9    (a) An adult recipient of services or the recipient's 10guardian, if the recipient is under guardianship, and the 11recipient's substitute decision maker, if any, must be 12informed of the recipient's right to refuse medication or 13electroconvulsive therapy. The recipient and the recipient's 14guardian or substitute decision maker shall be given the 15opportunity to refuse generally accepted mental health or 16developmental disability services, including but not limited 17to medication or electroconvulsive therapy. If such services 18are refused, they shall not be given unless such services are 19necessary to prevent the recipient from causing serious and 20imminent physical harm to the recipient or others and no less 21restrictive alternative is available. The facility director 22shall inform a recipient, guardian, or substitute decision 23maker, if any, who refuses such services of alternate services 24available and the risks of such alternate services, as well as 25the possible consequences to the recipient of refusal of such   SB3750- 3 -LRB104 20663 KTG 34161 b1services.2    (b) Psychotropic medication or electroconvulsive therapy 3may be administered under this Section for up to 24 hours only 4if the circumstances leading up to the need for emergency 5treatment are set forth in writing in the recipient's record.6    (c) Administration of medication or electroconvulsive 7therapy may not be continued unless the need for such 8treatment is redetermined at least every 24 hours based upon a 9personal examination of the recipient by a physician or a 10nurse under the supervision of a physician and the 11circumstances demonstrating that need are set forth in writing 12in the recipient's record.13    (d) Neither psychotropic medication nor electroconvulsive 14therapy may be administered under this Section for a period in 15excess of 72 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and 16holidays, unless a petition is filed under Section 2-107.1 and 17the treatment continues to be necessary under subsection (a) 18of this Section. Once the petition has been filed, treatment 19may continue in compliance with subsections (a), (b), and (c) 20of this Section until the final outcome of the hearing on the 21petition.22    (e) The Department shall issue rules designed to ensure 23insure that in State-operated mental health facilities 24psychotropic medication and electroconvulsive therapy are 25administered in accordance with this Section and only when 26appropriately authorized and monitored by a physician or a   SB3750- 4 -LRB104 20663 KTG 34161 b1nurse under the supervision of a physician in accordance with 2accepted medical practice. The facility director of each 3mental health facility not operated by the State shall issue 4rules designed to ensure insure that in that facility 5psychotropic medication and electroconvulsive therapy are 6administered in accordance with this Section and only when 7appropriately authorized and monitored by a physician or a 8nurse under the supervision of a physician in accordance with 9accepted medical practice. Such rules shall be available for 10public inspection and copying during normal business hours.11    (f) The provisions of this Section with respect to the 12emergency administration of psychotropic medication and 13electroconvulsive therapy do not apply to facilities licensed 14under the Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized Mental Health 15Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community Care Act, or 16the MC/DD Act.17    (g) Under no circumstances may long-acting psychotropic 18medications be administered under this Section.19    (h) Whenever psychotropic medication or electroconvulsive 20therapy is refused pursuant to subsection (a) of this Section 21at least once that day, the psychiatrist or advanced practice 22psychiatric nurse physician shall determine and state in 23writing the reasons why the recipient did not meet the 24criteria for administration of medication or electroconvulsive 25therapy under subsection (a) and whether the recipient meets 26the standard for administration of psychotropic medication or   SB3750- 5 -LRB104 20663 KTG 34161 b1electroconvulsive therapy under Section 2-107.1 of this Code. 2If the psychiatrist or advanced practice psychiatric nurse 3physician determines that the recipient meets the standard for 4administration of psychotropic medication or electroconvulsive 5therapy under Section 2-107.1, the facility director or his or 6her designee shall petition the court for administration of 7psychotropic medication or electroconvulsive therapy pursuant 8to that Section unless the facility director or his or her 9designee states in writing in the recipient's record why the 10filing of such a petition is not warranted. This subsection 11(h) applies only to State-operated mental health facilities.12    (i) The Department shall conduct annual trainings for all 13physicians and registered nurses working in State-operated 14mental health facilities on the appropriate use of emergency 15administration of psychotropic medication and 16electroconvulsive therapy, standards for their use, and the 17methods of authorization under this Section. 18(Source: P.A. 98-104, eff. 7-22-13; 99-180, eff. 7-29-15.) 19    (405 ILCS 5/2-107.1)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 2-107.1)20    Sec. 2-107.1. Administration of psychotropic medication 21and electroconvulsive therapy upon application to a court.22    (a) (Blank).23    (a-5) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 2-107 of 24this Code, psychotropic medication and electroconvulsive 25therapy may be administered to an adult recipient of services   SB3750- 6 -LRB104 20663 KTG 34161 b1on an inpatient or outpatient basis without the informed 2consent of the recipient under the following standards:3        (1) Any person 18 years of age or older, including any 4    guardian, may petition the circuit court for an order 5    authorizing the administration of psychotropic medication 6    and electroconvulsive therapy to a recipient of services. 7    The petition shall state that the petitioner has made a 8    good faith attempt to determine whether the recipient has 9    executed a power of attorney for health care under the 10    Powers of Attorney for Health Care Law or a declaration 11    for mental health treatment under the Mental Health 12    Treatment Preference Declaration Act and to obtain copies 13    of these instruments if they exist. If either of the 14    above-named instruments is available to the petitioner, 15    the instrument or a copy of the instrument shall be 16    attached to the petition as an exhibit. The petitioner 17    shall deliver a copy of the petition, and notice of the 18    time and place of the hearing, to the respondent, his or 19    her attorney, any known agent or attorney-in-fact, if any, 20    and the guardian, if any, no later than 3 days prior to the 21    date of the hearing. Service of the petition and notice of 22    the time and place of the hearing may be made by 23    transmitting them via facsimile machine or secured 24    electronic mail to the respondent or other party. Upon 25    receipt of the petition and notice, the party served, or 26    the person delivering the petition and notice to the party   SB3750- 7 -LRB104 20663 KTG 34161 b1    served, shall acknowledge service. If the party sending 2    the petition and notice does not receive acknowledgement 3    of service within 24 hours, service must be made by 4    personal service. A petition requesting that the court 5    authorize treatment with psychotropic medication shall 6    specify the full names of the medications and anticipated 7    range of dosage that comprise such treatment. The petition 8    also may include a request that the court authorize 9    alternative or alternate treatments with psychotropic 10    medications, but only where the petition sets forth the 11    psychotropic medications and the anticipated range of 12    dosages for each alternative or alternate and each 13    combination of psychotropic medications that may be 14    administered simultaneously. 15        The petition may include a request that the court 16    authorize such testing and procedures as may be essential 17    for the safe and effective administration of the 18    psychotropic medication or electroconvulsive therapy 19    sought to be administered, but only where the petition 20    sets forth the specific testing and procedures sought to 21    be administered.22        If a hearing is requested to be held immediately 23    following the hearing on a petition for involuntary 24    admission, then the notice requirement shall be the same 25    as that for the hearing on the petition for involuntary 26    admission, and the petition filed pursuant to this Section   SB3750- 8 -LRB104 20663 KTG 34161 b1    shall be filed with the petition for involuntary 2    admission.3        (2) The court shall hold a hearing within 7 days of the 4    filing of the petition. The People, the petitioner, or the 5    respondent shall be entitled to a continuance of up to 7 6    days as of right. An additional continuance of not more 7    than 7 days may be granted to any party (i) upon a showing 8    that the continuance is needed in order to adequately 9    prepare for or present evidence in a hearing under this 10    Section or (ii) under exceptional circumstances. The court 11    may grant an additional continuance not to exceed 21 days 12    when, in its discretion, the court determines that such a 13    continuance is necessary in order to provide the recipient 14    with an examination pursuant to Section 3-803 or 3-804 of 15    this Act, to provide the recipient with a trial by jury as 16    provided in Section 3-802 of this Act, or to arrange for 17    the substitution of counsel as provided for by the 18    Illinois Supreme Court Rules. The hearing shall be 19    separate from a judicial proceeding held to determine 20    whether a person is subject to involuntary admission but 21    may be heard immediately preceding or following such a 22    judicial proceeding and may be heard by the same trier of 23    fact or law as in that judicial proceeding.24        (3) Unless otherwise provided herein, the procedures 25    set forth in Article VIII of Chapter III of this Act, 26    including the provisions regarding appointment of counsel,   SB3750- 9 -LRB104 20663 KTG 34161 b1    shall govern hearings held under this subsection (a-5).2        (4) Psychotropic medication and electroconvulsive 3    therapy may be administered to the recipient if and only 4    if it has been determined by clear and convincing evidence 5    that: all of the following factors are present. In 6    determining whether a person meets the criteria specified 7    in the following paragraphs (A) through (G), the court may 8    consider evidence of the person's history of serious 9    violence, repeated past pattern of specific behavior, 10    actions related to the person's illness, or past outcomes 11    of various treatment options.12            (A) That the recipient has a serious mental 13        illness or developmental disability; .14            (B) That because of said mental illness or 15        developmental disability, the recipient currently 16        exhibits any one of the following: (i) deterioration 17        of his or her ability to function, as compared to the 18        recipient's ability to function prior to the current 19        onset of symptoms of the mental illness or disability 20        for which treatment is presently sought, (ii) 21        suffering, or (iii) threatening behavior; .22            (C) That the illness or disability has existed for 23        a period marked by the continuing presence of the 24        symptoms set forth in item (B) of this subdivision (4) 25        or the repeated episodic occurrence of these 26        symptoms; .  SB3750- 10 -LRB104 20663 KTG 34161 b1            (D) That the benefits of the treatment outweigh 2        the harm; .3            (E) That the recipient lacks the capacity to make 4        a reasoned decision about the treatment; .5            (F) That other less restrictive services have been 6        explored and found inappropriate; and .7            (G) if If the petition seeks authorization for 8        testing and other procedures, that such testing and 9        procedures are essential for the safe and effective 10        administration of the treatment.11        (4.5) In determining whether there is clear and 12    convincing evidence, the court may consider evidence 13    presented, if any, about a recipient's history of serious 14    violence, repeated past pattern of specific behavior 15    related to the recipient's illness, or outcomes of past 16    treatments. 17        (5) In no event shall an order issued under this 18    Section be effective for more than 90 days. A second 19    90-day period of involuntary treatment may be authorized 20    pursuant to a hearing that complies with the standards and 21    procedures of this subsection (a-5). Thereafter, 22    additional 180-day periods of involuntary treatment may be 23    authorized pursuant to the standards and procedures of 24    this Section without limit. If a new petition to authorize 25    the administration of psychotropic medication or 26    electroconvulsive therapy is filed at least 15 days prior   SB3750- 11 -LRB104 20663 KTG 34161 b1    to the expiration of the prior order, and if any 2    continuance of the hearing is agreed to by the recipient, 3    the administration of the treatment may continue in 4    accordance with the prior order pending the completion of 5    a hearing under this Section.6        (6) An order issued under this subsection (a-5) shall 7    designate the persons authorized to administer the 8    treatment under the standards and procedures of this 9    subsection (a-5). Those persons shall have complete 10    discretion not to administer any treatment authorized 11    under this Section. The order shall also specify the 12    medications and the anticipated range of dosages that have 13    been authorized and may include a list of any alternative 14    medications and range of dosages deemed necessary. In 15    addition, the order may authorize the administration of 16    any alternative or alternate treatment that is requested 17    in the petition and for which the court finds clear and 18    convincing evidence that the benefits of the alternative 19    or alternate treatment outweigh the harm and the recipient 20    lacks the capacity to make a reasoned decision about the 21    treatment. The medications and the anticipated range of 22    dosages for any alternative or alternate treatment that 23    the court authorizes shall be included in the order. Where 24    the simultaneous use of multiple psychotropic medications 25    is authorized, the order shall specify the combinations 26    that are authorized.   SB3750- 12 -LRB104 20663 KTG 34161 b1    (a-10) The court may, in its discretion, appoint a 2guardian ad litem for a recipient before the court or 3authorize an existing guardian of the person to monitor 4treatment and compliance with court orders under this Section. 5    (b) A guardian may be authorized to consent to the 6administration of psychotropic medication or electroconvulsive 7therapy to an objecting recipient only under the standards and 8procedures of subsection (a-5).9    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, a 10guardian may consent to the administration of psychotropic 11medication or electroconvulsive therapy to a non-objecting 12recipient under Article XIa of the Probate Act of 1975.13    (d) Nothing in this Section shall prevent the 14administration of psychotropic medication or electroconvulsive 15therapy to recipients in an emergency under Section 2-107 of 16this Act.17    (e) Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this Section, 18psychotropic medication or electroconvulsive therapy may be 19administered pursuant to a power of attorney for health care 20under the Powers of Attorney for Health Care Law or a 21declaration for mental health treatment under the Mental 22Health Treatment Preference Declaration Act over the objection 23of the recipient if the recipient has not revoked the power of 24attorney or declaration for mental health treatment as 25provided in the relevant statute.26    (f) The Department shall conduct annual trainings for   SB3750- 13 -LRB104 20663 KTG 34161 b1physicians and registered nurses working in State-operated 2mental health facilities on the appropriate use of 3psychotropic medication and electroconvulsive therapy, 4standards for their use, and the preparation of court 5petitions under this Section before any such psychiatrists or 6advanced practice psychiatric nurses may petition the court or 7testify at a hearing under this Section. 8(Source: P.A. 100-710, eff. 8-3-18.) 9    (405 ILCS 5/3-611)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 3-611)10    Sec. 3-611. Filing petition, first certificate, and proof 11of service. 12    (a) Within 24 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and 13holidays, after the respondent's admission under this Article, 14the facility director of the facility shall file 2 copies of 15the petition, the first certificate, and proof of service of 16the petition and statement of rights upon the respondent with 17the court in the county in which the facility is located. 18    (b) Upon completion of the second certificate, the 19facility director shall promptly file it with the court and 20provide a copy to the respondent. 21    (c) The facility director shall make copies of the 22certificates available to the attorneys for the parties upon 23request. 24    (d) Upon the filing of the petition and first certificate, 25the court shall set a hearing to be held within 5 days,   SB3750- 14 -LRB104 20663 KTG 34161 b1excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays, after receipt of 2the petition. The court shall direct that notice of the time 3and place of the hearing be served upon the respondent, his 4responsible relatives, and the persons entitled to receive a 5copy of the petition pursuant to Section 3-609.6    (e) For purposes of this Section, (1) a respondent is 7admitted to a mental health facility at the earlier of the 8respondent's confinement or receipt of treatment and (2) a 9respondent who is ordered discharged in accordance with 10Section 3-809 or subsection (b) of Section 3-901, or 11discharged upon notice by the facility director as provided by 12subsection (a) of Section 3-903, remains admitted to a mental 13health facility until the respondent is physically released 14from the mental health facility and thereafter physically 15enters a mental health facility. 16(Source: P.A. 98-865, eff. 8-8-14.) 17    (405 ILCS 5/3-807)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 3-807)18    Sec. 3-807. Testimony. No respondent may be found subject 19to involuntary admission on an inpatient or outpatient basis 20unless at least one psychiatrist, clinical social worker, 21clinical psychologist, advanced practice psychiatric nurse, or 22qualified examiner who has examined the respondent testifies 23in person at the hearing. No administration of psychotropic 24medication or electroconvulsive therapy without the informed 25consent of the recipient may be authorized unless at least one   SB3750- 15 -LRB104 20663 KTG 34161 b1psychiatrist or advanced practice psychiatric nurse who has 2examined the recipient testifies in person at the hearing. The 3respondent may waive the requirement of the testimony subject 4to the approval of the court.5(Source: P.A. 101-587, eff. 1-1-20.)